Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Soil and Water Conservation Districts.
§ 10.1-536.
Removal from office.

Any district director may be removed by the Board for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, or may be removed in accordance with the provisions of general law. Upon receipt of a sworn complaint against a director filed by a majority of the directors of that same district, the Board shall (i) notify the district director that a complaint has been filed against him and (ii) hold a hearing to determine whether the district director’s conduct constitutes neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-51; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891; 1996, c. 493.

§ 10.1-537.
Representatives of governing bodies to be invited to consult with directors.

The district directors shall invite the legislative body of any locality located near the territory comprised within the district to designate a representative to advise and consult with the directors of the district on all questions of program and policy which may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of such locality.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-52; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-538.
District is political subdivision.

A soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this article shall constitute a political subdivision of this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-53; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-539.
Surveys and dissemination of information.

Districts are authorized to (i) conduct surveys, investigations, and research relating to soil erosion and floodwater and sediment damages, and to agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water, and the preventive and control measures and works of improvement needed; (ii) publish the results of such surveys, investigations, or research; and (iii) disseminate information concerning preventive and control measures and works of improvement. However, in order to avoid duplication of research activities, no district shall initiate any research program except in cooperation with the government of the Commonwealth or the United States.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-54; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-540.
Demonstrational projects.

Districts are authorized to conduct demonstrational projects within the district on lands owned or controlled by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies, with the consent and cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the owner and occupier of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands. The purpose of such projects is to demonstrate by example the means, methods, and measures by which soil and water resources may be conserved, and soil erosion in the form of soil washing may be prevented and controlled, and works of improvement for flood prevention or agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water may be carried out.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-55; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-541.
Preventive and control measures.

Districts are authorized to carry out preventive and control measures and works of improvement for flood prevention or agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water within the district including, but not limited to, engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation and changes in use of land on lands owned or controlled by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies, with the consent and cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the owner and occupier of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-56; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-542.
Financial aid to agencies and occupiers.

Districts are authorized to enter into agreements, within the limits of available appropriations, to give, lend or otherwise furnish financial or other aid to any governmental or other agency, or any occupier of lands within the district, to provide erosion-control and prevention operations and works of improvement for flood prevention or agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water within the district. Agreements shall be subject to such conditions as the directors may deem necessary to advance the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-57; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-543.
Acquisition, improvement and disposition of property.

Districts are authorized to (i) obtain options upon and to acquire, by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any property, real or personal, or rights or interests therein; (ii) maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired, to receive income from such properties and to expend such income in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this article; and (iii) sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of their property or interests therein in furtherance of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-58; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-544.
Making material and equipment available.

Districts are authorized to make available, on terms they prescribe, to land occupiers within the district, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds and seedlings and other material or equipment that will assist land occupiers to conserve soil resources, to prevent and control soil erosion and to prevent floods or to carry out the agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-59; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-545.
Construction, improvement, operation and maintenance of structures.

Districts are authorized to construct, improve, operate and maintain such structures as may be necessary or convenient for the performance of any of the operations authorized in this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-60; 1956, c. 654; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-546.
Development of programs and plans.

Districts are authorized to develop comprehensive programs and plans for the conservation of soil resources, for the control and prevention of soil erosion, for flood prevention or for agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water within the district. Such programs and plans shall specify the acts, procedures, performances, and avoidances which are necessary or desirable to effect such programs and plans, including the specification of engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, cropping programs, tillage practices, and changes in use of land. After such programs and plans have been approved by the Board, districts are authorized to publish such programs and plans, and information, and bring them to the attention of occupiers of lands within the district.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-61; 1956, c. 654; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-546.1.
Delivery of Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program.

Districts shall locally deliver the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program described under §

10.1-2128.1

, under the direction of the Board, as a means of promoting voluntary adoption of conservation management practices by farmers and land managers in support of the Department’s nonpoint source pollution management program.

History.

2004, c. 474; 2009, cc. 209, 263; 2013, cc. 593, 658.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 209 and 263 are identical, and substituted “Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program described under §

10.1-2128.1

” for “Commonwealth’s Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Assistance Program.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 593 and 658 are identical, and substituted “Board” for “Department.”

§ 10.1-547.
Acquisition and administration of projects; acting as agent for United States, etc.; acceptance of gifts.

Districts shall have the following additional authority:

To acquire by purchase, lease, or other similar means, and to administer, any soil conservation, flood prevention, drainage, irrigation, agricultural and nonagricultural water management, erosion control, or erosion prevention project, or combinations thereof, located within its boundaries undertaken by the United States or any of its agencies, or by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies;

To manage, as agent of the United States or any of its agencies, or of the Commonwealth or any of its agencies, any soil conservation, flood prevention, drainage, irrigation, agricultural and nonagricultural water management, erosion control or erosion prevention project, or combinations thereof, within its boundaries;

To act as agent for the United States or any of its agencies, or for the Commonwealth or any of its agencies, in connection with the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation, or administration of any soil conservation, flood prevention, drainage, irrigation, agricultural and nonagricultural water management, erosion control, or erosion prevention project, or combinations thereof, within its boundaries;

To accept donations, gifts, and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, or from the Commonwealth or any of its agencies or from any other source, and to use or expend such moneys, services, materials, or other contributions in carrying on its operations.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-62; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-577. Deed of Easement for Open-Space Land — Riparian Zone.

§ 10.1-548.
Contracts; rules.

Districts are authorized to have a seal; to have perpetual succession unless terminated as hereinafter provided; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of their powers; to make, amend and repeal regulations not inconsistent with this chapter, to effect their purposes and powers.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-63; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-549.
Cooperation between districts.

The directors of any two or more districts may cooperate in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-4; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-549.1.
Virginia Envirothon.

Districts in partnership with other districts, agencies, organizations, and associations are authorized to coordinate and implement the Virginia Envirothon Program, administered by the Virginia Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts, which enables learning experiences for high school students through competitive events focusing on natural resource conservation.

History.

2003, c. 402.

§ 10.1-550.
State agencies to cooperate.

Agencies of the Commonwealth which have jurisdiction over or administer any state-owned lands, and agencies of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth which have jurisdiction over or administer any publicly owned lands lying within the boundaries of any district, shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the district directors in the effectuation of programs and operations undertaken pursuant to this chapter. The district directors shall be given free access to enter and perform work upon such public-owned lands.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-5; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-551.
Conditions for extension of benefits.

As a condition to the extending of any benefits under this chapter to, or the performance of work upon, any lands not owned or controlled by the Commonwealth or any of its agencies, the district directors may require contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise to any operations conferring such benefits, and may require land occupiers to enter into and perform such agreements or covenants as to the permanent use of such lands that will tend to prevent or control erosion and prevent floodwaters and sediment damages thereon.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-64; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-552.
Renting machinery and equipment.

Districts are authorized to rent the machinery and other equipment made available to them by the Department to governing bodies and, individuals, or groups of individuals to be used by them for the purpose of soil and water conservation upon such terms as the district directors deem proper.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-65; 1954, c. 670; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 373 H, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

10.1-552

, Code of Virginia, Soil and Water Conservation Districts are hereby authorized to recover a portion of the direct costs of services rendered to landowners within the district and to recover a portion of the cost for use of district-owned conservation equipment. Such recoveries shall not exceed the amounts expended by a district on these services and equipment.”

§ 10.1-553.
Petition by landowners.

Any time after two years after the organization of a district, any twenty-five owners of land lying within the boundaries of the district may file a petition with the Board requesting that the operations of the district be terminated and the existence of the district discontinued.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-106; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-554.
Hearings.

The Board may conduct public meetings and public hearings upon the termination petition to assist it in the considerations thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-107; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-555.
Referendum.

Within sixty days after a termination petition has been received by the Board it shall give due notice of the holding of a referendum and shall supervise the referendum, and issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof. The ballot shall contain the following question: “Shall the existence of the (name of the soil and water conservation district) be terminated?

• Yes

• No”

All registered voters residing within the boundaries of the district shall be eligible to vote in the referendum. No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any related matters shall invalidate the referendum or the result if proper notice has been given and if the referendum has been fairly conducted.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-108; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-556.
Determination of Board.

The Board shall publish the result of the referendum and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the Board determines that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record the determination and deny the petition. If the Board determines that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record its determination and certify the determination to the district directors. In making its determination the Board shall consider the proportion of the votes cast in favor of the discontinuance of the district to the total number of votes cast, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control operations within the district, and other relevant economic and social factors. However, the Board shall not have authority to determine that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum have been cast in favor of the continuance of such district.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-109; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-557.
Duty of directors after certification of Board.

Upon receiving from the Board certification that the Board has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, the district directors shall proceed to determine the affairs of the district. The district directors shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and shall pay the proceeds of the sale into the state treasury. The district directors shall then file an application, duly verified, with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, for the discontinuance of the district, and shall transmit with the application the certificate of the Board setting forth the determination of the Board that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and the proceeds paid over as provided by law, and shall set forth a full accounting of such properties and proceeds of the sale. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall issue to the district directors a certificate of dissolution and shall record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in his office.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-110; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-558.
Effect of issuance of certificate of dissolution.

Upon issuance of a certificate of dissolution, all ordinances and regulations previously adopted and in force within such district shall be of no further force. All contracts entered into, to which the district or district directors are parties, shall remain in force for the period provided in the contracts. The Board shall be substituted for the district or district directors as party to the contracts. The Board shall be entitled to all benefits and subject to all liabilities under the contracts and shall have the same right and liability to perform, to require performance, to sue and be sued thereon, and to modify or terminate such contracts by mutual consent or otherwise, as the district directors would have had.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-111; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-559.
Petitions limited to once in five years.

The Board shall not entertain petitions for the discontinuance of any district, conduct elections upon such petitions or make determinations pursuant to such petitions more often than once in five years.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-112; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891.